Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1587.06
Fees.

Any person filing a foreign judgment or a judgment from another court in this state shall pay to the clerk of the district or county court a fee as provided in section 33-106 or 33-123 for filing a transcript of judgment. Fees for filing, transcription, or other enforcement proceedings shall be as provided for judgments of the courts of this state.

Laws 1993, LB 458, § 6;

Laws 1995, LB 270, § 1;

Laws 2018, LB193, § 30.